Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB431.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 189 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Six (6) months after the completion of each highway pavement marking project
or other highway paint application, the Transportation Cabinet shall conduct a
quality assurance check. The quality assurance check shall:
(a) Include an inspection of the highway pavement markings for adherence to
the Federal Highway Administration regulations and standards; and
(b) Be conducted after dark to inspect the level of retroreflectivity.
(2) If a highway pavement marking project fails the required quality assurance test,
the Transportation Cabinet shall repair or reapply the highway pavement
markings within thirty (30) days and conduct a quality assurance in accordance
with subsection (1) of this section.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/10/2025 3:53 PM Jacketed